Mississippi, session 2026, SB2424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 33-1-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 33-1-21.  (a)  All officers and employees of any department, agency, or institution of the State of Mississippi, or of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, who shall be members of any of the reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, or former members of the service of the United States discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, shall be entitled to leave of absence from their respective duties, without loss of pay, time, annual leave, or efficiency rating, on all days during which they shall be ordered to duty to participate in training at encampments, field exercises, maneuvers, outdoor target practice, or for other exercises, for periods not to exceed * * * fifteen twenty-one (21) (15) days, and all such officers and employees shall for such periods in excess of * * * fifteen (15) twenty-one (21) days, be entitled to leave of absence from their respective duties without loss of time, annual leave, or efficiency rating until relieved from duty, and shall when relieved from such duty, be restored to the positions held by them when ordered to duty, or a position of like seniority, status and pay; provided that such person:  (1) when discharged or released from the armed forces shall have received a certificate of satisfactory completion of service, (2) shall be still qualified to perform the duties of such position, (3) shall make application for re-employment within ninety (90) days after June 1, 1966, or within ninety (90) days after such person is relieved from such training and service or released from hospitalization for a period of not more than one (1) year for causes attributable to such services.  Any person restored to a position under the above provisions shall not be discharged from such position without cause within one (1) year after restoration.  The fact that there has been a change of administration affecting any position with the State of Mississippi, or any county, city, town, political subdivision, or any state institution thereof shall in no manner affect or deny to such person his former position, and regardless of any limitation on the number of employees, such person shall be re-employed.  The provisions of this section do not apply to any officer elected by the vote of the electors of the state, county, municipality, or political subdivisions, when the statutory or constitutional term of the office has expired upon the discharge of such person from military service, but this section does grant re-employment rights to all other officers and employees of the State of Mississippi, or of any county, municipality, or political subdivision when ordered to military duty. (b)  In the event the persons referred to in the foregoing subsection are not reinstated, as therein required, upon application by any such person to the county attorney of the county in which he was employed, or to the district attorney of the district in which he was employed, such attorney applied to shall act as the attorney for such person and shall institute such action as may be necessary to enforce compliance with the provisions of said subsection, and no fees or court costs shall be taxed against the person applying for benefits thereunder. (c)  Insofar as any of the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this section shall be considered controlling, and any other acts or parts of acts in conflict herewith are hereby repealed insofar as they are in conflict with this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.